Ohio, session 136, SB192.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. (A) The General Assembly finds that access to 5
affordable housing in rural areas is an important part of 6
fostering a robust and lasting population. Accordingly, it is 7
the intent of the General Assembly to provide funding for the 8
purpose of increasing the availability of single-family homes in 9
the rural areas of this state. 10
(B) The General Assembly declares its intent to provide 11
funding to counties, or to a township or municipal corporation 12
that is fully or partially located in a county, that meets both 13
of the following: 14
(1) Has a population of not more than seventy-five 15
thousand; 16
(2) The number of privately owned housing units authorized 17
by building permit, according to the most recent data provided 18
by the United States census bureau, is less than the average 19
number of private housing units authorized by building permit 20

S. B. No. 192 Page 2
As Introduced
for counties in this state. 21
(C) The funds are intended to be used to develop, repair, 22
or upgrade infrastructure needed for the construction of single- 23
family, residential dwellings that are all of the following: 24
(1) Located in a county that meets the criteria prescribed 25
by divisions (B)(1) and (2) of this section; 26
(2) Situated on parcels of land that are no larger than a 27
quarter of an acre, as indicated by records kept by the county 28
auditor; 29
(3) Located in areas that are zoned exclusively for 30
single-family, residential dwellings. 31